Tennessee statutes. Title 2 Elections
Chapter 9

Voting Machines

2-9-101. Specifications — Contract for modification.

A voting machine to be used in Tennessee must provide facilities for voting for candidates at both primary and general elections, at nonpartisan elections or at a combination of a nonpartisan and partisan primary or general election. It must permit a voter to vote for any person for any office, whether or not nominated as a candidate by a political party. It must ensure voting in absolute secrecy. It must permit a voter to vote for any candidate or on any special measure for whom or on which the voter is lawfully entitled to vote but none other. It must permit a voter to vote for the proper number of candidates for an office but no more. It must be provided with a lock or locks by which immediately after the polls are closed any movement of the voting or registering mechanism can be absolutely prevented. It may be either manually or electrically operated. An electric machine must convert to manual operation, and the alternate type of operation must be a standard function of the machine and not be designed as an emergency or temporary device only. Each voting machine shall have not less than eight (8) columns and shall be equipped with interlocks in the following manner:

for the basic lever type machine, interlocks on columns 1, 4, and 7;

for the 2.5 lever type machine, interlocks on columns 1, 4, and 7 and an additional main interlock adjacent to column 10;

on the 3.2 eight column machine, interlocks on columns 1, 4, and 7 and an additional main interlock adjacent to column 8; and

on the 3.2-10.25 lever type machine, interlocks on columns 1, 4, and 7 and an additional main interlock adjacent to column 10.

Any voting machine not presently equipped as described in (a) shall be modified pursuant to a contract to be let by the coordinator of elections through normal purchasing procedures. The contract shall contain such provisions as the coordinator of elections, secretary of state and commissioner of finance and administration shall deem necessary and proper, and shall provide for the use of new parts only. Furthermore, the contract shall provide for the inspection of parts, labor, and equipment by a team of local machine technicians, and the costs of such inspection at the local level shall be borne by the company or firm awarded the contract.

A party lever device enabling a voter to vote for all the nominees of a particular political party by operating a single lever is prohibited except that a party lever shall be provided for each political party's candidates for presidential and vice presidential electors.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-901; Acts 1981, ch. 461, § 1.

Cross-References. Form of ballots on voting machines, §2-5-206.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Elections, § 12.

2-9-102. Equipment furnished for machine.

The county election commission shall have each voting machine furnished:

With an electric light or a substitute for one which will give sufficient light to enable the voters while in the booth to read the ballot labels and to enable election officials to examine the counters; and

With a curtain or other equipment so as to conceal the voter and the voter's action while voting.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-902.

2-9-103. Voting machine technicians.

The representatives of each political party on the county election commission shall jointly appoint a voting machine technician who is a member of their political party and who is qualified by training or experience to prepare and maintain the voting machines, and the county election commission shall appoint as many assistants as may be necessary for the proper preparation of the machines for elections and for their maintenance, storage, and care.

The voting machine technicians, under the direction of the commission, shall have charge of the voting machines and shall represent the commission during the preparation of the voting machines.

The voting machine technicians shall serve at the pleasure of the commissioners who appointed them. The assistants shall serve at the pleasure of the commission.

The commission shall fix the compensation of the voting machine technicians and assistants commensurate with the work required.

Duties imposed on the voting machine technician by this chapter shall be performed jointly by the voting machine technicians.

Any voting machine technician appointed by the county election commission who performs such duties on a part-time basis and who has other full-time employment shall be excused without pay from such full-time employment for the days required for the performance of the technician's duties.

No employer of a voting machine technician being excused from employment pursuant to this section shall require such technician to use vacation time or other leave time for the days such technician has been excused from employment to perform the technician's duties.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-903; Acts 1998, ch. 741, § 1.

2-9-104. Custody of machines and keys.

The local authority adopting voting machines shall have custody of them when they are not in use at an election and shall preserve and keep them in repair. All keys for voting machines shall be securely locked between elections by the voting machine technician. A public officer, who is entitled to the custody of the machine for any period of time, is entitled to the keys necessary for the proper use of the machines in the officer's charge.

Local authorities shall provide ample police protection against tampering with or injury to the voting machines after they have been prepared for and during an election and shall provide adequate storage at all other times.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-904.

2-9-105. Preparation of machines for election.

The county election commission shall have the proper ballot labels placed on the voting machines and shall have the machines put in proper order for voting with the registering counters set at zero (000), the counting mechanisms locked, and each machine sealed with a pre-numbered seal. The voting machine technician shall certify in writing that, before sealing each machine but after preparing it for an election, such technician has tested each voting lever and that each machine is in proper working order.

Before examining the voting machines to determine whether they are properly set up, the commission shall mail notices to the chairs of the county executive committees of the political parties and to independent candidates stating where and when the machines will be examined. Each county executive committee chair and county primary board chair may designate a representative who may be present to see that the machines are properly prepared for use in the election.

When the machines have been examined, the party representatives and either the commission or the voting machine technician shall make a certificate in writing which shall be filed in the county election commission office stating the number of machines, whether all of the machines are set at zero (000), the number registered on each protective counter and the number on each metal seal with which the machines are sealed.

The keys for each machine shall be sealed in an envelope showing the location where the machine is to be used, the number of the machine, the number on the protective counter, and the seal number.

The commission may delegate its duty to examine the machines to the voting machine technician.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1978, ch. 754, § 4; T.C.A., § 2-905; Acts 1992, ch. 895, § 1.

2-9-106. Delivery of machines to polling places.

The election commission shall ensure that the voting machines are delivered to the polling places in a timely manner and are set up in the proper manner for use at the election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-906; Acts 2008, ch. 928, § 17.

2-9-107. Storage of machines.

Within twenty-four (24) hours after the close of the polls, or as soon thereafter as practicable, the voting machine technician shall have the machines returned to the storage places provided under §2-9-104(b).

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., 2-907.

2-9-108. Voting machines to remain locked.

Each voting machine shall remain locked against voting for five (5) days after the certification of the election and as much longer as may be necessary or advisable because of a contest over the result of the election. When another election necessitating the use of a particular voting machine is to be held within a period of thirty (30) days after an election, that voting machine may be opened after five (5) days upon the agreement of all the candidates in the earlier election whose names appeared on the ballot on that machine. A voting machine may be opened and examined upon the order of any court of competent jurisdiction at any time.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-908; Acts 2010, ch. 1137, § 2.

2-9-109. Precincts required to use voting machines — Use of paper ballots in certain municipal elections.

Precincts having more than three hundred (300) registered voters shall be equipped by the county in which they are located with voting machines for use in all elections and smaller precincts may be so equipped. If the governing body of any county does not provide voting machines as required by the preceding sentence, the county election commission, instead of the county governing body, shall equip the precincts with voting machines in accordance with §§ 2-9-112 — 2-9-114. However, in counties having populations of not less than twelve thousand one hundred (12,100) nor more than twelve thousand two hundred (12,200), according to the federal census of 1970 or any subsequent federal census, voting machines for any precinct having fewer than one thousand (1,000) registered voters shall not be purchased without the approval of the county commission.

Any municipality with a population of five thousand (5,000) or less, according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, may elect to use paper ballots instead of voting machines for municipal elections, when there is no opposition for any of the offices involved. Such decision shall be made known to the county election commission at the time the municipality directs the election commission to call its election.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; 1974, ch. 641, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-909; Acts 1982, ch. 661, § 1; 2012, ch. 1101, § 8.

Code Commission Notes.

This section reflects the incorporation into this section of Acts 1974, ch. 641, § 1, which has been added as the last sentence in (a).

Compiler's Notes. For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Law Reviews.

Counting the Votes: Electronic Voting Irregularities, Election Integrity, and Public Corruption, 49 U. Mem. L. Rev. 979 (Summer 2019).

2-9-110. Use of non-standard machines.

The county election commission, with the approval of the coordinator of elections and the state election commission, may provide for the use of voting machines which do not meet the requirements of this title except under this section.

Machines and procedure for such use shall provide as much protection for the purity of the ballot and against election fraud as do voting machines which otherwise meet the requirements of this title.

The use of voting machines in compliance with this section and the rules of the coordinator of elections shall be as valid for all purposes in an election as if the machines had otherwise met the requirements of this title for voting machines.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-910.

2-9-111. Payment for machines.

The governing body of a city, town or county may adopt voting machines and, upon the adoption and purchase of voting machines, shall provide for payment for the machines in the way it deems for the best interest of the locality and may for that purpose issue bonds, certificates of indebtedness or other obligations which shall be a charge on the city, town or county. Such bonds, certificates or other obligations may be issued with or without interest, payable at such time or times as the authorities may determine, but shall not be issued or sold at less than par. If it is proposed that bonds be issued to finance the purchase of voting machines, such bonds may not be issued unless approved in an election by a majority of the votes cast by the voters of the city, town or county affected.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-911.

Cross-References. Revenue bond law, Title 7, chapter 34.

2-9-112. State financing of voting machines — Agreement.

When the governing body of a county requests the coordinator of elections to have the state finance the acquisition of a specified number of voting machines under §§2-9-112 —2-9-114, the governing body of the county and the coordinator of elections shall enter into an agreement to be known as a “contract, lease and option,” subject to the following requirements:

The original lease term shall be for a period agreed to by the governing body of the county and the coordinator of elections. The county shall have the exclusive right and option to extend the term of the lease from year to year for periods of one (1) year at a time for an agreed period. The total lease period shall in no case exceed twenty (20) years.

The rentals prescribed for the original term and for each of the full number of years for which the lease may be extended shall not be less than the amounts required in each of such years to amortize the total amount of bonds issued to defray the cost of the machines.

The governing body of the county shall agree, in each effective year of the lease, to maintain the voting machines.

If the governing body of the county fails or neglects to pay any of the rentals prescribed, the commissioner of finance and administration shall retain the sum necessary for such payment out of any state funds distributable to the county for any purpose. No statutory requirement that any distributable, state collected, locally shared funds shall be used exclusively for a designated purpose shall be construed as preventing the commissioner of finance and administration from taking out of such fund.

The contract, lease and option may contain any other reasonable provision deemed necessary and desirable by the commissioner, the coordinator of elections or the governing body of the county.

Subject to all of the above, when the governing body of a county requests the coordinator of elections to have the state finance the cost of modifying its voting machines in order to comply with the specifications of this chapter, the governing body of the county and the coordinator of elections shall enter into an agreement to be known as a “voting machine loan agreement.” The agreement shall be subject to all the terms and conditions as if the county were purchasing machines. The agreement shall provide that the state maintain a lien on such machines until such agreement is satisfied and that such agreements are subject to an annual interest rate of six percent (6%).

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-912; Acts 1981, ch. 461, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. This section may be affected by §9-1-116, concerning entitlement to funds, absent appropriation.

2-9-113. State financing of voting machines — Purchase.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall purchase or otherwise acquire voting machines to carry out § 2-9-112.

The coordinator of elections, subject to the approval of the commissioner, shall determine the number of machines to be purchased for the governing body of any county and enter into agreements, as provided in § 2-9-112, with the county for the financing of the machines. The coordinator of elections in determining the number of machines to be purchased for a county shall consider the following factors:

The amount of state funds available for the financing of voting machines;

Whether the county is making an initial acquisition of machines or is replacing old machines;

The need of the county for assistance in purchasing machines; and

Such other considerations as may be pertinent to carry out the purposes of this title.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-913.

2-9-114. Funding for voting machine loan fund.

All moneys paid by the county to the coordinator of elections under the provisions of either the contract, lease and option or the “voting machine loan agreement” shall be paid into the “voting machine loan fund” and shall be used to fund subsequent loans pursuant to §2-9-112 in the manner provided by law. Nothing in this section shall be construed to exclude or prevent future appropriations for the purpose of funding the voting machine loan fund.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-914; Acts 1999, ch. 313, § 1.

2-9-115. Use of voting machines owned by another governing body.

Nothing in this chapter shall prevent voting machines owned or controlled by one governing body from being used by another governing body when arrangements to do so are agreed upon by the affected governing bodies.

Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 1; T.C.A., § 2-915.

2-9-116. Use of voting machines by groups of citizens.

A county election commission may establish and implement a policy permitting the use of voting machines by a group of citizens; provided, that in any county having a metropolitan form of government, the decision to implement the policy is subject to the approval of the local governing body.

Acts 1993, ch. 518, §§ 21, 22; 1995, ch. 489, § 1.

2-9-117. Approval of voting machines — Reexamination of machines to ensure certification.

The state coordinator of elections and the state election commission shall approve any voting machine before a county election commission purchases such machine. Before the 2002 election cycle and at least every eight (8) years thereafter, the state coordinator of elections and the state election commission shall reexamine all voting machines to ensure such machines still meet the minimum criteria for certification. If a particular machine is not recertified by the coordinator of elections and the state election commission, the affected county election commission shall have two (2) years to purchase and implement machines that are properly certified.

Acts 2001, ch. 465, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2001, ch. 465, § 1, provided that the act shall be known and may be cited as “The 2000 Presidential Election Debacle Reform Bill of 2001.”

2-9-118. Prohibited acts by voting systems vendor or vendor's agent — Prohibited solicitation or acceptance by election officials.

An agent of a voting systems vendor or any person acting on behalf of a voting systems vendor shall not offer or attempt to offer anything of value to a state election commission member; county election commission member; the secretary of state; the coordinator of elections; the administrator of elections; an employee of the state election commission, the county election commission, or the secretary of state; or an immediate family member of such persons.

An agent of a voting systems vendor shall not knowingly make or cause to be made any false statement or misrepresentation of the facts concerning any matter for which the voting systems vendor is responsible to a state election commission member; county election commission member; the secretary of state; the coordinator of elections; the administrator of elections; or an employee of the state election commission, the county election commission, or the secretary of state.

A state election commission member; county election commission member; secretary of state; coordinator of elections; administrator of elections; employee of the state election commission, the county election commission, or the secretary of state; or an immediate family member of such persons, shall not solicit or accept anything of value in violation of subsection (a).

A voting systems vendor shall not make a loan of money to a state election commission member; a county election commission member; the secretary of state; the coordinator of elections; the administrator of elections; an employee of the state election commission, the county election commission, or the secretary of state; or an immediate family member of such persons, or to any other person on such person's behalf.

A state election commission member; county election commission member; the secretary of state; the coordinator of elections; the administrator of elections; an employee of the state election commission, the county election commission, or the secretary of state; or an immediate family member of such persons, shall not solicit or accept a loan in violation of subsection (d).

An agent of a voting systems vendor or any person acting on behalf of a voting systems vendor shall not permit a state election commission member; a county election commission member; the secretary of state; the coordinator of elections; the administrator of elections; an employee of the state election commission, the county election commission, or the secretary of state; or an immediate family member of such persons, to use the credit or a credit card of the voting systems vendor.

An agent of a voting systems vendor or any person acting on behalf of a voting systems vendor shall not pay the lodging expenses of a state election commission member; a county election commission member; the secretary of state; the coordinator of elections; the administrator of elections; an employee of the state election commission, the county election commission, or the secretary of state; or an immediate family member of such persons.

A state election commission member; county election commission member; the secretary of state; coordinator of elections; administrator of elections; employee of the state election commission, the county election commission, or the secretary of state; or an immediate family member of such persons, shall not accept travel expenses, meals, or lodging paid by a voting systems vendor or agent of the voting systems vendor.

An agent of a voting systems vendor or any person acting on behalf of a voting systems vendor shall not provide a gift, directly or indirectly, to a state election commission member; a county election commission member; the secretary of state; the coordinator of elections; the administrator of elections; an employee of the state election commission, county election commission, or the secretary of state; or an immediate family member of such persons, unless the gift is a novelty, such as a pin, button, pen, or similar small item or token routinely given to customers, suppliers, or potential customers or suppliers in the ordinary course of business.

Acts 2019, ch. 250, § 5.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 250, § 9. October 1, 2019.